src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!Distributed under the terms of the GNU General Public License version 2
! or any later version.

! =============== !
! Verb morphology !
! =============== !


! Tense-Mood and pointers to derivational affxes for IV and TV
! ============================================================

! 1. Stems are first flagged according to transitivity in IV, IV_vow, TV, and TV_vow 
! 2. Secondly they get derivatives and mood markers according to stem type
! 3. Thirdly they get personal endings
! 4. Fourthly they get enclitic endings
! 5. Finally they pass through a filter that clears away left-over flags


! ============================ !
! 1. Basic verb and mode tags  !
! ============================ !

! The stem classes get their flags

LEXICON IV
@P.IV.ON@    junctionIV ;

LEXICON IV_vow
@P.IV.ON@ junctionIV_vow ;

LEXICON TV
@P.TV.ON@   junctionTV ;

LEXICON TV_vow
@P.TV.ON@  junctionTV_vow ;


! The stem classes are split in three:
! vn, vv and directly to inflection

LEXICON junctionIV
	nominalizers ;
	verbalderivatives ;
	verb_intr ;

LEXICON junctionIV_vow
	nominalizers ;
	verbalderivatives ; 
	verb_intr_vow ;

LEXICON junctionTV
	verbalderivatives ;
	verb_tr ;

LEXICON junctionTV_vow
	verbalderivatives ;
	verb_tr_vow ;


! ============= !
! 2a. Mode tags !
! ============= !

! IV modes

LEXICON verb_intr
+V+Ind+Prs:%>tu      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%>tua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Int:%>pi          intverbaffix2 ;
+V+Int:%>pa	         intverbaffix3 ;
+V+ConReal:%>łu      conpersonaffix ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu    conpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;

LEXICON verb_intr_vow
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ru      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%>rua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Int:%>vi          intverbaffix2 ; !XXX ve?
+V+Int:%>va          intverbaffix3 ;
+V+ConReal:%>vlu     conpersonaffix ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu    conpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;

LEXICON verb_intr_suq
+V+Ind+Prs:%>su      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%>sua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Int:%>pi          intverbaffix2 ;
+V+Int:%>pa	         intverbaffix3 ;
+V+ConReal:%>łu      conpersonaffix ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu    conpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;

LEXICON verb_intr_chuq
+V+Ind+Prs:%>chu      indpersonaffix ;
+V+Ind+Prt:%>chua     indpersonaffix ;
+V+Int:%>pi          intverbaffix2 ;
+V+Int:%>pa	         intverbaffix3 ;
+V+ConReal:%>łu      conpersonaffix ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu    conpersonaffix ;
+V+Cau+3Sg:%>man     clit ;


! TV modes

LEXICON verb_tr  
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ge     indpersonaffix_tv_12 ; 
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ga     indpersonaffix_tv_3  ; 
+V+Ind+Prt:%>raq    indpersonaffix_tv ;     !XXX Note that q should be deleted in front of k
+V+Ind+Prt:%>t      indpersonaffix_tv ;     !XXX So, what about the vowel following t?
+V+Int:%>vi         intpersonaffix_tv_12 ;  !XXX affix is p/vI for 1, 2 and p/va for 3rd subj
+V+Int:%>va         intpersonaffix_tv_3  ;  !XXX affix is p/vI for 1, 2 and p/va for 3rd subj
+V+ConReal:%>łu     conpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu   conpersonaffix_tv ;
!+V+Cau+3Sg:%>      clit ;


LEXICON verb_tr_vow 
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ge     indpersonaffix_tv_12 ; 
+V+Ind+Prs:%>ga     indpersonaffix_tv_3  ; 
+V+Ind+Prt:%>raq    indpersonaffix_tv ; !XXX
+V+Int:%>vi          intpersonaffix_tv_12 ; !XXX
+V+Int:%>va          intpersonaffix_tv_3  ;  !XXX
+V+ConReal:%>vlu    conpersonaffix_tv ;
+V+ConUnreal:%>lu   conpersonaffix_tv ;
!+V+Cau+3Sg:%>      clit ;




! =============================== !
! 2b. Verbal derivational affixes !
! =============================== !

LEXICON verbalderivatives  ! hundreds of derivatives in here
+LLATU:%^TRUNC%>llatu	        verbalderivatives_cont_vow ;
+LLATU=NIAQ:%^TRUNC%>llatuniaq	verbalderivatives_cont ;
+NIAQ:%>niaq                    verbalderivatives_cont ; !isiq-niaq-tuq 
+NIAQ=ŊIT:%>niaŋit              verbalderivatives_cont ;
+ŊIT:%^TRUNC%>ŋit                verbalderivatives_cont ;
+SAAĠE:%>saaġe	                verbalderivatives_cont_vow ;
+SAAĠE=ŊIT:%>saaġeŋit           verbalderivatives_cont ;
+TEQ:%^TRUNC%>teq                verbalderivatives_cont ;

LEXICON nominalizers !Taken out of verbalderivatives to avoid transitive stems going here 
+VIK:%^C%>vik	 tup- ; 

LEXICON verbalderivatives_cont
@R.IV.ON@ verb_intr ;
@R.TV.ON@ verb_tr ;

LEXICON verbalderivatives_cont_vow
@R.IV.ON@ verb_intr_vow ;
@R.TV.ON@ verb_tr_vow ;







! ======================== !
! 3. Person-number affixes !
! ======================== !

! IV
! --

LEXICON indpersonaffix 
+1Sg:%>ŋa	clit_sing ;
+2Sg:%>ten	clit_sing ; ! NB not *tin to block *tiñ
+3Sg:%>q	clit_sing ; ! Acc. Edna 31
+1Du:%>guk	clit ;
+2Du:%>sik	clit ; ! tik
+3Du:%>k 	clit ; ! Acc. Edna 31
+1Pl:%>tut	clit ;
+2Pl:%>si	clit ;
+3Pl:%>t	clit ; ! Acc. Edna 31

LEXICON intverbaffix2
+2Sg:%>t        clit_sing ; ! XXX rule for t/n alternation!
+2Du:%>sik      clit ; ! tik
+2Pl:%>si       clit ;

LEXICON intverbaffix3
+3Sg:%>	        clit_sing ; ! ! According to Edna p. 31
+3Du:%>k 	clit ;        ! According to Edna p. 31
+3Pl:%>t	clit ;        ! According to Edna p. 31

LEXICON conpersonaffix !NB Incorrect flexives. Basically just transferred from Kalaallisut
+1Sg:%>ŋa	clit_sing ;
+2Sg:%>tin	clit_sing ;
+4Sg:%>ni	clit_sing ; ! ruq ??
+1Du:%>nuk	clit ;
+2Du:%>tik	clit ; ! tik
+4Du:%>tik 	clit ; ! ruq ??
+1Pl:%>ta	clit ;
+2Pl:%>si	clit ;
+4Pl:%>tiŋ	clit ; ! r

! TV
! --

LEXICON   conpersonaffix_tv 
+1Sg+3SgO:%>ŋa clit ;

LEXICON indpersonaffix_tv
 indpersonaffix_tv_12 ;
 indpersonaffix_tv_3  ;


LEXICON indpersonaffix_tv_12
+1Sg+2SgO:%>kpiñ    clit ;
+1Sg+2DuO:%>vsik    clit ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>vsi     clit ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>ga      clit ;
+1Sg+3DuO:%>ka      clit ; !(k)ka
+1Sg+3PlO:%>tka     clit ;

+2Sg+1SgO:%>ŋma     clit ;
+2Sg+1DuO:%>vsiguk  clit ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>vsigut  clit ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>n  clit ;
+2Sg+3DuO:%>kiñ  clit ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>tin  clit ;

+1Du+2SgO:%>vsigiñ  clit ;
+1Du+2DuO:%>vsik  clit ;
+1Du+2PlO:%>vsi  clit ; !vsI
+1Du+3SgO:%>kpuk  clit ;
+1Du+3DuO:%>vuk  clit ; 
+1Du+3PlO:%>vuk  clit ;

+2Du+1SgO:%>ksik  clit ;
+2Du+1DuO:%>sik  clit ;
+2Du+1PlO:%>sik  clit ;
+2Du+3SgO:%>vsiŋŋa  clit ;
+2Du+3DuO:%>vsiguk  clit ;
+2Du+3PlO:%>vsigut  clit ;

+1Pl+2SgO:%>vsigiñ  clit ;
+1Pl+2DuO:%>vsik  clit ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>vsi  clit ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>kput  clit ;
+1Pl+3DuO:%>vut  clit ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>vut  clit ;

+2Pl+1SgO:%>vsiñŋa  clit ; !grammar says vsiñŋa, looks like typo for ŋŋ
+2Pl+1DuO:%>vsiguk  clit ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>vsigut  clit ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>ksi  clit ;
+2Pl+3DuO:%>si  clit ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>si  clit ;


LEXICON indpersonaffix_tv_3 
+3Sg+1SgO:%>aŋa  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II
+3Sg+1SgO:%>aŋi  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II
+3Sg+1DuO:%>atiguk  clit ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>atigut  clit ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>atin  clit ;
+3Sg+2DuO:%>asik  clit ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>asi  clit ;
+3Sg+3SgO:%>a  clit_sing ;
+3Sg+3DuO:%>ik  clit ;
+3Sg+3PlO:%>it clit ; !I(t)

+3Du+1SgO:%>aŋŋa  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II
+3Du+1SgO:%>aŋŋi  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II
+3Du+1DuO:%>atiguk  clit ;
+3Du+1PlO:%>atigut  clit ;
+3Du+2SgO:%>atin  clit ;
+3Du+2DuO:%>asik  clit ;
+3Du+2PlO:%>asi  clit ;
+3Du+3SgO:%>ak  clit ;
+3Du+3DuO:%>ik  clit ;
+3Du+3PlO:%>it clit ; !!ik?

+3Pl+1SgO:%>anŋa  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II (nŋ typo?)
+3Pl+1SgO:%>anni  clit ; ! see fn 2,3 p. 70 in Edna II
+3Pl+1DuO:%>atiguk clit ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>atigut  clit ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>atin  clit ;
+3Pl+2DuO:%>asik  clit ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>asi  clit ;
+3Pl+3SgO:%>at  clit ; 
+3Pl+3DuO:%>ik  clit ;
+3Pl+3PlO:%>ait  clit ;
