src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
ait TV ; !! aitkaa ! fetches it, goes to get it (N)
aitchu TV_vow ; !! aitchuġaa   ! gives it
aktigi IV_vow ;  !! aktigiruq ! it is that big
akut TV ; !! akutkaa ! stirs it
alapit IV ;  !! alapittuq ! inattentive, fools around, is confused
alġaqsru TV_vow ; !! alġaqsruġaa   ! exhorts him, tells him the right way to behave
anniq IV ; ! to get hurt
anuqłiq verb_intr_suq ; !! anuqłiqsuq ! is windy
api IV_vow ;  !! apiruq ! is snow covered
apqusraa TV_vow ; !! apqusraaġaa   ! passes him (K)
ataut TV ; !! atautkaa ! goes beneath it
atchi TV_vow ; !! atchiġaa   ! names him
atchik verb_intr_suq ; !! atchiksuq ! is lowly, is humble (K)
atiqsaaq IV ;  !! atiqsaaqtuq ! travels down river by sled
atuq TV ;
atuŋaiq verb_intr_suq ; !! atuŋaiqsuq ! is worthless
aula IV_vow ;  !! aularuq ! dances (K)
avanŋa TV_vow ; !! avanŋagaa ! all around him
ayaagit IV ;  !! ayaagittuq ! is undecided, desires to but can't begin (N)
aŋalanŋait TV ; !! aŋalanŋaitkaa ! did not control him
aŋi IV_vow ;  !! aŋiruq ! is big
aŋu TV_vow ; !! aŋugaa ! procures it
iivaqsaaq IV ;  !! iivaqsaaqtuq ! rounds a bend (K)
ikima IV_vow ;  !! ikimaruq ! is burning, is on (of electric light)
iku TV_vow ; ! to put (object) on board
iḷḷiaġuru TV_vow ; !! iḷḷiaġuruġaa   ! combs it (K)
iḷunŋu IV_vow ;  !! iḷunŋuruq ! stomach hurts
immaq IV ;  !! immaqtuq ! is leaking
inillak TV ; !! inillakkaa ! is placing it
isiqattaaq IV ;  !! isiqattaaqtuq ! is visiting
isivġii IV_vow ;  !! isivġiiruq ! judges (N)
isumalitqi TV_vow ; !! isumalitqigaa ! repents of it (lit. rethinks it)
itqanaiq verb_intr_suq ; !! itqanaiqsuq ! is ready, finished
iñugik verb_intr_suq ; !! iñugiksuq ! is handsome, beautiful
iñukpallik IV ;  !! iñukpalliktuq ! comes from, originates
iññiaqsi IV_vow ;  !! iññiaqsiruq ! stretches hide on frame
iŋi TV_vow ; !! iŋiġaa   ! asks him, begs him, prays to him
kalik TV ; !! kalikkaa ! drags it
kanŋusruk IV ;  !! kanŋusruktuq ! is ashamed, bashful (K)
kapi IV_vow ;  !! kapiruq ! stabs
katit TV ; !! katitkaa ! gathers it
kiḷiq verb_intr_suq ; !! kiḷiqsuq ! has cut self
kiñuġauti IV_vow ;  !! kiñuġautiruq ! is too late (K)
kiŋmaq IV ;  !! kiŋmaqtuq ! bites
kunik TV ; !! kunikkaa ! kisses him
mamitit TV ; !! mamititkaa ! healed him
mitaaq IV ;  !! mitaaqtuq ! jokes
miñuk TV ; !! miñukkaa ! paints it
miñułi TV_vow ; !! miñułiġaa   ! paints it
nakuu IV_vow ;  !! nakuuruq ! is good
nalautit TV ; !! nalautitkaa ! aims it, focuses it
nalupqinaq IV ;  !! nalupqinaqtuq ! is uncertain, unpredictable
natiġvik verb_intr_suq ; !! natiġviksuq ! is ground drifting
navik TV ; !! navikkaa ! breaks it
naġġugi TV_vow ; !! naġġugigaa ! despises it, rejects it
niksaaq IV ;  !! niksaaqtuq ! burps (K)
niuri IV_vow ;  !! niuriruq ! unloads, longshores
nuvuyaliq verb_intr_suq ; !! nuvuyaliqsuq ! is overcast, is getting cloudy
paamak IV ;  !! paamaktuq ! crawls on all fours
pii TV_vow ; !! piiġaa   ! removes it
piḷaiq verb_intr_suq ; !! piḷaiqsuq ! is tired
pisik TV ;
pisuġiuq verb_intr_suq ; !! pisuġiuqsuq ! is enough (as when filling gas tank)
punniliuq IV ;  !! punniliuqtuq ! bakes bread (N)
punŋa IV_vow ;  !! punŋaruq ! bows low, hides from animal while stalking (used for non-appearance of sun in December) (K)
putyuk TV ; !! putyukkaa ! pinches it (K)
qaiq verb_intr_suq ; !! qaiqsuq ! is smooth, level, flat
qapiŋaisaa TV_vow ; !! qapiŋaisaaġaa   ! encourages him
qaummaiḷiq verb_intr_suq ; !! qaummaiḷiqsuq ! is lightning
qiluri IV_vow ;  !! qiluriruq ! has a muscle cramp
qimuk IV ;  !! qimuktuq ! pulls
qiviaq:qeviaq TV ; ! to turn one's head and look at
qutchik verb_intr_suq ; !! qutchiksuq ! is high
sapiġñaqsi IV_vow ;  !! sapiġñaqsiruq ! is difficult (K)
savagniuraaq IV ;  !! savagniuraaqtuq ! is doing what work he can!
siik verb_intr_suq ; !! siiksuq ! is cutting fish (for drying)
sik TV ; !! sikkaa ! shoots it, hits it (K)
simmi TV_vow ; !! simmiġaa   ! changes it, exchanges it
siŋaiyau IV_vow ;  !! siŋaiyauruq ! is pregnant (N)
suksraunġiq verb_intr_suq ; !! suksraunġiqsuq ! is destroyed
tainnait IV ;  !! tainnaittuq ! is like
tauqsi TV_vow ; !! tauqsiġaa   ! buys it
tautuk TV ; !! tautukkaa ! sees it
taŋiġiq verb_intr_suq ; !! taŋiġiqsuq ! is false (lies)
tupak TV ; !! tupakkaa ! startles him
tusaa IV_vow ;  !! tusaaruq ! hears (N)
tuttunniq verb_intr_suq ; !! tuttunniqsuq ! has apparently caught a caribou
tuvlau TV_vow ; !! tuvlauġaa   ! shields him, protects him
umiaq IV ; ! to take the boat and set up whaling camp
uunaġu TV_vow ; !! uunaġuġaa   ! it's warm
uġuu IV_vow ;  !! uġuuruq ! is wet from dew
uŋasik verb_intr_suq ; !! uŋasiksuq ! is far
